hr-HR: Materijal cijevi: Keramika; Krom; Zlato; Titanij; Turmalin; Ostalo
nb: Tønnemateriale: Keramikk; Krom; Gull; Titan; Turmalin; Annet
pt-BR: Material do modelador: Cerâmica; Cromado; Gold; Titânio; Turmalina; Outro
vi: Chất liệu thùng: Gốm; Chrome; Vàng; Titanium; Ngọc bích tỷ; Khác
pl: Materiał beczki: Ceramika; Chrome; Złota; Titanium; Turmalina; Inne
es: Material del barril: Cerámica; Cromo; Dorado; Titanio; Turmalina; Otros
fi: Tynnyrin materiaali: Keraaminen; Kromi; Kulta; Titaani; Turmaliini; Muu
da: Tøndemateriale: Keramik; Krom; Guld; Titanium; Turmalin; Andet
de: Fassmaterial: Keramik; Chrom; Gold; Titan; Turmalin; Sonstiges
th: วัสดุสำหรับทรงบาร์เรล: เซรามิก; สไตล์โครม; โกลด์; ไทเทเนียม; ทัวร์มาลีน; อื่นๆ
ja: パイプの素材: セラミック; クロム; ゴールド; チタン; トルマリン; その他
tr: Varil malzemesi: Seramik; Krom; Gold; Titanyum; Turmalin; Diğer
zh-CN: 筒体材质: 陶瓷制品; 铬合金; 金色; 钛; 电气石; 其他
el: Υλικό κυλίνδρου: Κεραμικό; Χρώμιο; Χρυσό; Τιτάνιο; Τουρμαλίνη; Άλλο
cs: Materiál nástavce: Keramika; Chrom; Zlatá; Titanové; Turmalín; Jiné
zh-TW: 筒體材質: 陶瓷; 鉻; 金色; 鈦; 電氣石; 其他
ru: Материал рабочей поверхности: Керамика; Хром; Золото; Титан; Турмалин; Другое
en: Barrel material: Ceramic; Chrome; Gold; Titanium; Tourmaline; Other
it: Materiale del cilindro: Ceramica; Cromo; Oro; Titanio; Tormalina; Altro
pt-PT: Material do tambor: Cerâmica; Cromado; Ouro; Titânio; Turmalina; Outro
hu: Henger anyaga: Kerámia; Króm; Arany; Titán; Turmalin; Egyéb
fr: Matériau du baril: Céramique; Chrome; Or; Titane; Tourmaline; Autre
sl-SI: Material za kodralno palico: Keramika; Krom; Zlato; Titan; Turmalin; Drugo
ko: 배럴 소재: 세라믹; 크로뮴; 금색; 티타늄; 전기석; 기타
sv: Cylindermaterial: Keramisk; Krom; Gyllene; Titan; Turmalin; Övrigt
lt-LT: Vamzdžio medžiaga: Keramika; Chromas; Auksas; Titanas; Turmalinas; Kita
sk-SK: Materiál dávkovača: Keramický; Chróm; Zlato; Titán; Turmalín; Iné
nl: Materiaal vat: Keramiek; Chroom; Gold; Titanium; Toermalijn; Andere
bg-BG: Материал на работната повърхност: Керамика; Хром; Злато; Титан; Турмалин; Други
ro-RO: Material container: Ceramic; Crom; Aur; Titan; Turmalină; Altele